Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 6 County and Municipal Probation
42-8-106.1.
Powers and duties of Board of Community Supervision.

The board shall have the following powers and duties, provided that, with respect to promulgating the rules, regulations, and standards set forth in this subsection, the board shall seek input from the commissioner of community supervision:

To promulgate rules and regulations to implement the uniform professional standards for probation officers and uniform contract standards for the establishment of probation services by a county, municipality, or consolidated government established in Code Section 42-8-107;

To promulgate rules and regulations establishing a 40 hour initial orientation for newly hired private probation officers and for 20 hours per annum of continuing education for private probation officers, provided that the 40 hour initial orientation shall not be required of any person who has successfully completed a basic course of training for supervision of probationers or parolees certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council or any private probation officer who has been employed by a private probation corporation, enterprise, or agency for at least six months as of July 1, 1996;

To promulgate rules and regulations establishing a 40 hour initial orientation for probation officers and for 20 hours per annum of continuing education for such probation officers, provided that the 40 hour initial orientation shall not be required of any person who has successfully completed a basic course of training for supervision of probationers or parolees certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council or any probation officer who has been employed by a county, municipality, or consolidated government as of March 1, 2006;

To promulgate rules and regulations relative to compliance with the provisions of this article and enforcement mechanisms;

To promulgate rules and regulations establishing registration for any private corporation, private enterprise, private agency, county, municipality, or consolidated government providing probation services under the provisions of this article, subject to the provisions of Code Section 42-8-109.3;

To promulgate rules and regulations requiring criminal history record checks of individuals seeking to become private probation officers and establishing procedures for such criminal record checks. DCS on behalf of the board shall conduct a criminal history records check for individuals seeking to become probation officers as provided in Code Section 35-3-34. The board shall promulgate rules and regulations relating to restrictions regarding misdemeanor convictions. An agency or private entity shall also be authorized to conduct a criminal history records check of a person employed as a probation officer or private probation officer or individuals seeking such positions. The criminal history records check may be conducted in accordance with Code Section 35-3-34 and may be based upon the submission of fingerprints of the individual whose records are requested. The Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation under the rules established by the United States Department of Justice for processing and identification of records. The federal record, if any, shall be obtained and returned to the requesting agency or entity;

To promulgate rules and regulations requiring probation officers and private probation officers to be registered with DCS, pay a fee for such registration, and provide for the board to impose sanctions and fines on such officers for misconduct; and

To impose sanctions for noncompliance with this article or the board’s rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-106.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-7/SB 367; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 42/SB 429.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “agency or entity” for “entity or agency” at the end of paragraph (6).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-7/SB 367, effective July 1, 2016, in enacting this Code section redesignated the provisions of former subsection (b) of Code Section 42-8-106 as this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-107.
Uniform professional standards and uniform contract standards.

The uniform professional standards contained in this subsection shall be met by any person employed as and using the title of a private probation officer or probation officer. Any such person shall be at least 21 years of age at the time of appointment to the position of private probation officer or probation officer and shall have completed a standard two-year college course or have four years of law enforcement experience; provided, however, that any person employed as a private probation officer as of July 1, 1996, and who had at least six months of experience as a private probation officer or any person employed as a probation officer by a county, municipality, or consolidated government as of March 1, 2006, shall be exempt from such college requirements. Any person employed or appointed as a municipal probation officer on or after July 1, 2017, shall not be authorized to exercise the power of arrest as a municipal probation officer unless such person meets the requirements provided for under Code Section 35-8-13.1; provided, however, that such person shall only exercise the power of arrest upon individuals whom he or she is supervising under this article, unless such person is certified as a peace officer by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council. Every private probation officer shall receive an initial 40 hours of orientation upon employment and shall receive 20 hours of continuing education per annum as approved by DCS, provided that the 40 hour initial orientation shall not be required of any person who has successfully completed a basic course of training for supervision of probationers or parolees certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council or any private probation officer who has been employed by a private probation corporation, enterprise, or agency for at least six months as of July 1, 1996, or any person employed as a probation officer by a county, municipality, or consolidated government as of March 1, 2006. In no event shall any person convicted of a felony be employed as a probation officer or private probation officer.

The uniform contract standards contained in this subsection shall apply to all private probation contracts executed under the authority of Code Section 42-8-101. The terms of any such contract shall state, at a minimum:

The extent of the services to be rendered by the private corporation or enterprise providing probation supervision;

Any requirements for staff qualifications, including those contained in this Code section as well as any surpassing those contained in this Code section;

Requirements for criminal record checks of staff in accordance with the rules and regulations established by the board;

Policies and procedures for the training of staff that comply with rules and regulations promulgated by the board;

Bonding of staff and liability insurance coverage;

Staffing levels and standards for offender supervision, including frequency and type of contacts with offenders;

Procedures for handling the collection of all court ordered fines, fees, and restitution;

Procedures for handling indigent offenders to ensure placement of such indigent offenders irrespective of the ability to pay;

Circumstances under which revocation of an offender’s probation may be recommended;

Reporting and record-keeping requirements; and

Default and contract termination procedures.

The uniform contract standards contained in this subsection shall apply to all counties, municipalities, and consolidated governments that enter into agreements to provide probation services under the authority of Code Section 42-8-101. The terms of any such agreement shall state at a minimum:

The extent of the services to be rendered by the local governing authority providing probation services;

Any requirements for staff qualifications, including those contained in this Code section;

Requirements for criminal record checks of staff in compliance with the rules and regulations established by the board;

Policies and procedures for the training of staff that comply with the rules and regulations established by the board;

Staffing levels and standards for offender supervision, including frequency and type of contacts with offenders;

Procedures for handling the collection of all court ordered fines, fees, and restitution;

Circumstances under which revocation of an offender’s probation may be recommended;

Reporting and record-keeping requirements; and

Default and agreement termination procedures.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1465, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1107, § 5; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 2/SB 44; Code 1981, §

42-8-107

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-8/SB 367; Ga. L. 2017, p. 673, § 2-2/SB 149.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-102 as present Code Section 42-8-107; substituted “board” for “council” throughout, in subsection (a), substituted “shall” for “must” in the second sentence, substituted “basic course of training for supervision of probationers or parolees” for “basic course of training for supervision of probationers or parolees” in the third sentence, and, substituted “private” for “utilize the title of” in the last sentence; in subsections (b) and (c), substituted “Code Section 42-8-101” for “Code Section 42-8-100”; in paragraphs (b)(2) and (c)(2), substituted “including” for “to include”; in subsection (d), deleted “subsections (a), (b), and (c) of” preceding “this Code section” in the first sentence, substituted “January 1, 2017” for “January 1, 2007” in the second sentence, substituted “such” for “the” in the third sentence, substituted “Such” for “This” at the beginning of the fourth sentence, and substituted “such” for “these” near the end.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “DCS” for “the board” in the middle of the third sentence of subsection (a); deleted “with a judge” following “enter into agreements” in the middle of subsection (c); and deleted former subsection (d), which read: “The board shall review the uniform professional standards and uniform contract and agreement standards contained in this Code section and shall submit a report on its findings to the General Assembly. The board shall submit its initial report on or before January 1, 2017, and shall continue such reviews every two years thereafter. Nothing contained in such report shall be considered to authorize or require a change in such standards without action by the General Assembly having the force and effect of law. Such report shall provide information which will allow the General Assembly to review the effectiveness of the minimum professional standards and, if necessary, to revise such standards. This subsection shall not be interpreted to prevent the board from making recommendations to the General Assembly prior to its required review and report.”.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), added the third sentence, and inserted “Georgia” in the middle of the fourth sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in subsection (b): “No local funds shall be used to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act without the consent of the local governing authority.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-108.
Quarterly report to judge and council; records to be open for inspection.

Any private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency contracting to provide probation services or any county, municipality, or consolidated government entering into an agreement under the provisions of this article shall provide to the judge who consented to such contract or agreement and DCS a quarterly report summarizing the number of offenders under supervision; the amount of fines, statutory surcharges, and restitution collected; the amount of fees collected and the nature of such fees, including probation supervision fees, rehabilitation programming fees, electronic monitoring fees, drug or alcohol detection device fees, substance abuse or mental health evaluation or treatment fees if such services are provided directly or otherwise to the extent such fees are known, and drug testing fees; the number of community service hours performed by probationers under supervision; a listing of any other service for which a probationer was required to pay to attend; the number of offenders for whom supervision or rehabilitation has been terminated and the reason for the termination; and the number of warrants issued during the quarter, in such detail as DCS may require. Information reported pursuant to this subsection shall be annually submitted to the governing authority that entered into such contract and thereafter be subject to disclosure pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50. Local governments are encouraged to post electronic copies of the annual report on the local government’s website, if such website exists.

All records of any private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency contracting to provide services or of any county, municipality, or consolidated government entering into an agreement under the provisions of this article shall be open to inspection upon the request of the affected county, municipality, consolidated government, court, the Department of Audits and Accounts, an auditor appointed by the affected county, municipality, or consolidated government, the Department of Corrections, DCS, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, or the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 692, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 2/SB 44; Code 1981, §

42-8-108

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-9/SB 367; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 42/HB 323.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-103 as present Code Section 42-8-108; in subsection (a), substituted “board” for “council” and inserted “the amount of fees collected and the nature of such fees, including probation supervision fees, rehabilitation programming fees, electronic monitoring fees, drug or alcohol detection device fees, substance abuse or mental health evaluation or treatment fees, and drug testing fees; the number of community service hours performed by probationers under supervision; a listing of any other service for which a probationer was required to pay to attend;” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; in subsection (b), substituted “an auditor appointed by the affected county, municipality, or consolidated government, Department of Corrections, Department of Community Supervision, State Board of Pardons and Paroles, or the board” for “or the council or its designee” at the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in the first sentence of subsection (a), substituted “who consented to such contract or agreement and DCS” for “with whom the contract or agreement was made and the board” near the beginning, inserted “if such services are provided directly or otherwise to the extent such fees are known” in the middle, and substituted “DCS” for “the board” near the end; and substituted “DCS” for “Department of Community Supervision” near the end of subsection (b).

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “the” preceding “Department of Corrections” and “State Board of Pardons and Paroles” near the end of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in subsection (b): “No local funds shall be used to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act without the consent of the local governing authority.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 159 (2014).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-109.
Private entities conflicts of interest prohibited.

No private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency contracting to provide probation services under the provisions of this article nor any employees of such entities shall engage in any other employment, business, or activity which interferes or conflicts with the duties and responsibilities under contracts authorized in this article.

No private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency contracting to provide probation services under the provisions of this article nor its employees shall have personal or business dealings, including the lending of money, with probationers under their supervision.

No private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency contracting to provide probation services under the provisions of this article nor any employees of such entities, shall own, operate, have any financial interest in, be an instructor at, or be employed by any private entity which provides drug or alcohol education services or offers a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services.

No private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency contracting to provide probation services under the provisions of this article nor any employees of such entities shall specify, directly or indirectly, a particular DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program which a probationer may or shall attend. This paragraph shall not prohibit furnishing any probationer, upon request, with the names of certified DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Programs. Any person violating this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-104

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1107, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 24-2/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 2/SB 44; Code 1981, §

42-8-109

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in subsection (b): “No local funds shall be used to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act without the consent of the local governing authority.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-104 as present Code Section 42-8-109.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-109.1.
Public entities and employees conflicts of interest prohibited.

No county, municipality, or consolidated government probation office employee shall engage in any other employment, business, or activity which interferes or conflicts with the employee’s duties and responsibilities under agreements authorized in this article.

No county, municipality, or consolidated government probation office employee shall have personal or business dealings, including the lending of money, with probationers under the supervision of such probation office.

No county, municipality, or consolidated government probation office employee shall own, operate, have any financial interest in, be an instructor at, or be employed by any private entity which provides drug or alcohol education services or offers a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services.

No county, municipality, or consolidated government that provides probation services through agreement under the provisions of this article nor any employees of such shall specify, directly or indirectly, a particular DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program which a probationer may or shall attend. This paragraph shall not prohibit furnishing any probationer, upon request, with the names of certified DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Programs. Any person violating this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 2/SB 44; Code 1981, §

42-8-109.1

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-105 as present Code Section 42-8-109.1; deleted “probation officer or other” throughout; and, in subsection (a), deleted “officer’s or” preceding “employee’s duties”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in subsection (b): “No local funds shall be used to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act without the consent of the local governing authority.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-109.2.
Confidentiality of records.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-108 and subsection (b) of this Code section, all reports, files, records, and papers of whatever kind relative to the supervision of probationers by a private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency contracting under the provisions of this article or by a county, municipality, or consolidated government providing probation services under this article are declared to be confidential and shall be available only to the affected county, municipality, or consolidated government, or an auditor appointed by such county, municipality, or consolidated government, the judge handling a particular case, the Department of Audits and Accounts, the Department of Corrections, DCS, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, or the board.

Any probationer under supervision under this article shall:

Be provided with a written receipt and a balance statement each time he or she makes a payment;

Be permitted, upon written request, to have a copy of correspondence, payment records, and reporting history from his or her probation file, one time, and thereafter, he or she shall be required to pay a fee as set by DCS; provided, however, that the board shall promulgate rules and regulations clarifying what confidential information may be withheld from such disclosure; and

Be permitted, upon written request to DCS, to have a copy of the supervision case notes from his or her probation file when the commissioner of community supervision authorizes the release of such information in a written order; provided, however, that the board shall promulgate rules and regulations clarifying what confidential information may be withheld from such disclosure.

When a probationer claims that information is being improperly withheld from his or her file, the probationer may file a motion with the sentencing court seeking an in camera inspection of such file. The probationer shall serve such motion on the prosecuting attorney and probation officer or private probation officer as appropriate.

The following shall be subject to disclosure pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50:

The board’s rules and regulations regarding contracts or agreements for the provision of probation services;

The board’s rules and regulations regarding the conduct of business by private entities providing probation services as authorized by this article;

The board’s rules and regulations regarding county, municipal, or consolidated governments establishing probation systems as authorized by this article; and

The rules, regulations, operating procedures, and guidelines of any private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency providing probation services under the provisions of this article.

In the event of a transfer of the supervision of a probationer from a private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency or county, municipality, or consolidated government providing probation services under this article to DCS, DCS shall have access to any relevant reports, files, records, and papers of the transferring entity.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-106

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 692, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 2/SB 44; Code 1981, §

42-8-109.2

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-10/SB 367; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 42/HB 323.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated Code Section 42-8-106 as Code Section 42-8-109.2; and rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “DCS” for “Department of Community Supervision” near the end of subsection (a); substituted “DCS” for “the board” in subparagraphs (b)(1)(B) and (b)(1)(C); and substituted “DCS, DCS” for “the Department of Community Supervision, the Department of Community Supervision” in the middle of subsection (c).

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “the” preceding “Department of Corrections” and “State Board of Pardons and Paroles” near the end of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in subsection (b): “No local funds shall be used to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act without the consent of the local governing authority.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

In light of the enactment of this Code section, the reader is advised to consult the annotation following Code Section 42-8-106.

Law reviews.

For note, “Safe Haven No Longer: The Role of Georgia Courts and Private Probation Companies in Sustaining a De Facto Debtors’ Prison System,” see 48 Ga. L. Rev. 227 (2013).

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 159 (2014).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-109.3.
Registration with board.

All private corporations, private enterprises, and private agencies contracting or offering to contract for probation services shall register with DCS before entering into any contract to provide services. Any private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency registered with the board on or before June 30, 2016, shall be deemed registered with DCS; provided, however, that DCS shall be authorized to review such contract and shall be responsible for subsequent renewals or changes to such contract. The information included in such registration shall include the name of the corporation, enterprise, or agency, its principal business address and telephone number, the name of its agent for communication, and other information in such detail as DCS may require. No registration fee shall be required.

Any private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency required to register under the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection which fails or refuses to do so shall be subject to revocation of any existing contracts, in addition to any other fines or sanctions imposed by the board.

All counties, municipalities, and consolidated governments agreeing or offering to agree to establish a probation system shall register with DCS before entering into an agreement to provide services. Any county, municipality, or consolidated government that has a probation system registered with the board on or before June 30, 2016, shall be deemed registered with DCS; provided, however, that DCS shall be authorized to review such systems and shall be responsible for subsequent renewals or changes to such systems. The information included in such registration shall include the name of the county, municipality, or consolidated government, the principal business address and telephone number, a contact name for communication with DCS, and other information in such detail as DCS may require. No registration fee shall be required.

Any county, municipality, or consolidated government required to register under the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection which fails or refuses to do so shall be subject to revocation of existing agreements, in addition to any other sanctions imposed by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-107

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 692, § 4; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 2/SB 44; Ga. L. 2007, p. 363, § 1/HB 527; Code 1981, §

42-8-109.3

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-11/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-107 as present Code Section 42-8-109.3; substituted “board” for “council” throughout; added the second sentence to paragraph (a)(1); and added the second sentence to paragraph (b)(1). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “DCS” for “the board” throughout; in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(1), substituted “the board on or before June 30, 2016” for “the County and Municipal Probation Advisory Council on or before June 30, 2015”; in paragraph (b)(1), deleted “with the court” following “an agreement” in the first sentence, and substituted “board on or before June 30, 2016” for “County and Municipal Probation Advisory Council on or before June 30, 2015” in the middle of the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in subsection (b): “No local funds shall be used to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act without the consent of the local governing authority.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

In light of the enactment of this Code section, the reader is advised to consult the annotations following Code Section 42-8-107.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-109.4.
Applicability of article to contractors for probation services; requirements for private corporations, private enterprises and private agencies entering into written contracts for services.

The probation providers standards contained in this Code section shall be met by private corporations, private enterprises, or private agencies that enter into written contracts for probation services under the authority of Code Section 42-8-101. Any private corporation, private enterprise, or private agency which fails to meet the standards established in this subsection shall not be eligible to provide probation services in this state. All private corporations, private enterprises, or private agencies that enter into written contracts for probation services under the authority of Code Section 42-8-101 shall:

Register with DCS;

Meet all requirements as outlined in subsection (b) of Code Section 42-8-107;

Not own or control any finance business or lending institution which makes loans to probationers under its supervision; and

Employ at least one person who is responsible for the direct supervision of private probation officers employed by the corporation, enterprise, or agency and who shall have at least five years’ experience in corrections, parole, or probation services.

The standards contained in this subsection shall be met by all counties, municipalities, or consolidated governments entering into written agreements to provide probation services to any court under the authority of Code Section 42-8-101. Any county, municipality, or consolidated government which fails to meet the standards established in this subsection shall not be eligible to provide probation services. All counties, municipalities, or consolidated governments which enter into written agreements to provide probation services under the authority of Code Section 42-8-101 shall:

Register with DCS;

Meet the requirements of subsection (c) of Code Section 42-8-107; and

Employ at least one person who is responsible for the direct supervision of probation officers and who shall have at least five years’ experience in corrections, parole, or probation services.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-109.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-12/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-108 as present Code Section 42-8-109.4; and rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “DCS” for “the board” in paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

In light of the enactment of this Code section, the reader is advised to consult the annotations following Code Section 42-8-108.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-109.5.
Determination by court whether misdemeanor probation to be supervised by community supervision officer, private probation officer, or probation officer.

Whenever a probationer is under supervision by a community supervision officer, as such term is defined in Code Section 42-3-1, and sentenced to misdemeanor probation, the court shall determine whether the continuing supervision shall be performed by a community supervision officer, private probation officer, or probation officer.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-109.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).